dictsource/fa_rules
	// arabic form of words  (Babs) غ
		//فواعل eg. جوامع
			_L04وا) غ (L03_	q1e
			_خوا) غ (L03_+	q1a
		//فاعل eg. کاتب
			_L04ا) غ (L03_+	q1e
		//مفعول eg. مکتوب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعول eg. خروج
			_) غ (L04وL03_	q1o
		//فعال eg. شراب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعل eg. مکتب
			_م) غ (L04L03_+	q1
			_مL04) غ (L03_+	q1a
		//افعال eg. اخلاق (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعّل eg. مقدّس
			_م) غ (L04ّL03_+	q1a
			_مL04) غ (ّL03_+	q1q1a
		//تفعیل eg. تقدیم (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیل eg. صغیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیله eg. صغیره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر
			_اL03) غ (L03_+	q1a
		//تفاعیل eg. تدابیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//تفاعل eg. تفاوت
			_تL04ا) غ (L03_	q1o
		//تفعل eg. تفکر
			_ت) غ (L03L03_+	q1a
			_تL04) غ (L03_++	q1q1o
		//تفعّل eg. تفکّر
			_ت) غ (L03ّL03_+	q1a
			_تL04) غ (ّL03_+	q1q1o
		//مفاعل eg. مباحث
			_مL04ا) غ (L03_	q1e
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_ان) غ (L04اL03_++	q1e
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
		//مستفعل eg. مستخدم
			_مست) غ (L04L03_+	q1
			_مستL04) غ (L03_	q1e
		//متفاعل eg. متفاوت
			_متL04ا) غ (L03_	q1e
			_متL04ا) غ (ی_	q1
		//متفعل eg. متخصص
			_مت) غ (L04L03_++	q1a
			_متL04) غ (L03_	q1q1e
		//متفعّل eg. متخصّص
			_مت) غ (L04ّL03_++	q1a
			_متL04) غ (ّL03_	q1q1e
		//مفتعل eg. معتدل
			_م) غ (تL04L03_+	q1
			_مL04ت) غ (L03_	q1e
		//منفعل eg. منفجر
			_من) غ (L03L03_++	q1a
			_من) غ (یL03_+	q1a
			_منL04) غ (L03_	q1e
		//منفعله eg. منفجره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)


.group ف
	// special codes for ف
		
	// General Codes for Consonants
	ف (L01	f
	ف (L02	f
	L02) ف	f
	_ا) ف	f
	ف (ّL08	ff
	ف (ّ_	ff
	ف (ّL03	ffa
	ف (L03	fa
	L09) ف (ف+++	fa
	// ف as first letter in bondary of the words
		_) ف (L03	fa
	// ف in end of the words
		ف (_	f
	// ف before و and a vowel
		_) ف (وا	fa
		_) ف (وL02	fa
		_) ف (ویL03	fa
		_) ف (ویL01	f
		_) ف (ویL02	f
		_) ف (وی_	f
		L09) ف (وL02	f
	// Others 
		ف (ه_+++	f
		ف (ۀ_	f
		ف (ـL01	f
		ف (ـL02	f
		ف (ـL03	fa
		ف (ــL01	f
		ف (ــL02	f
		ف (ــL03	fa
		ف (ـــL01	f
		ف (ـــL02	f
		ف (ـــL03	fa
		ف (ــ	fa
	// Consonants Analyzer
	// Right to left characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 3 Consonants
			_آ) ف (L03_	fa
			_آ) ف (د_+	f
			_آ) ف (ر_+	f
			_او) ف (L03_+	f
			_ای) ف (L03_+	f
			_L04) ف (L03_	f
		//Analyzing  2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants
			_L03) ف (L05L06_	fa
			_L03) ف (L06L03_	f
			_آ) ف (L03L01	f
			_آ) ف (L03L02	f
			_L03) ف (L03L01	f
			_L03) ف (L06L03	fa
			_L03) ف (رL03+	fa
			_L03) ف (L05L03	f
		// Analyzing 3th  Consonant of 6 Consonants
			_L09L01) ف (L03L09L09	f
			_L03L03) ف (L03L09L09	f
			_L01L03) ف (L03L09L09	fa
		// Analyzing 4th  Consonant of 8 Consonants
			_L09L09L09) ف (L03L09L09L09	fa
	// Left to right characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants (left to right)
			L01L01) ف (L03_	fa
			L09L01) ف (L03_	f
			L09L01) ف (ن_+	fa
			L09L01) ف (ل_+	fa
			L09L01) ف (م_+	fa
			L09L01) ف (ر_+	fa
			L09L01) ف (ق_+	fa
			L09L01) ف (غ_+	fa
			L09L01) ف (L07_+N	f
			L01L03) ف (L03_	fa
			L01L03) ف (L07_+N	f
			L03L03) ف (L06_	f
			_آL03L06) ف (L05_	af
			L09L03L05) ف (L05_	af
			L03L06) ف (L05_	f
		// Analyzing 3th Consonant of 5 Consonants (left to right)
			L09ف) ف (L03L09_+	f
			L09L05) ف (L05L06_	fa
			L09L05) ف (L03L09_	f
			_L04L06) ف (L06L09_+	f
			_آL06) ف (L03L09_+	f
			L09L06) ف (L03L09_	fa
			L09L01) ف (L03L09_	f
		// Analyzing 4th Consonant of 7 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09) ف (L03L09L09_	f
			_L01L09L03) ف (L03L09L09_	f
			_L03L09L03) ف (L03L09L09_	fa
		// Analyzing 5th Consonant of 9 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09L09) ف (L03L09L09L09_	fa

	// Prefixes ف
		_) فرا (L04L09$noprefixP3@	faRA
		_) فرا (آL09$noprefixP3@	faRA

	// suffixes ف
		L09L09) فام (_Sm3	fAm
		L09L09) فر (_Sm2	faR
		L09L09) فروش (_Sm4	foRuS
		L09L09) فشان (_Sm4	feSAn
		L09L09) فریب (_Sm4	faRib
		L09L09) فرما (_Sm4	faRmA
		L09L09) فرسا (_Sm4	faRsA
		L09L09) فرنگی (_Sm5	faRangi

	// arabic form of words  (Babs) ف
		//فواعل eg. جوامع
			_L04وا) ف (L03_+	fe
			_خوا) ف (L03_+	f
		//فاعل eg. کاتب
			_L04ا) ف (L03_+	fe
		//مفعول eg. مکتوب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعول eg. خروج
			_) ف (L04وL03_	fo
		//فعال eg. شراب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعل eg. مکتب
			_م) ف (L04L03_+	f
			_مL04) ف (L03_+	fa
		//افعال eg. اخلاق (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعّل eg. مقدّس
			_م) ف (L04ّL03_+	fa
			_مL04) ف (ّL03_+	ffa
		//تفعیل eg. تقدیم (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیل eg. صغیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیله eg. صغیره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر
			_اL03) ف (L03_+	fa
		//تفاعیل eg. تدابیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//تفاعل eg. تفاوت
			_تL04ا) ف (L03_+	fo
		//تفعل eg. تفکر
			_ت) ف (L03L03_+	fa
			_تL04) ف (L03_++	ffo
		//تفعّل eg. تفکّر
			_ت) ف (L03ّL03_+	fa
			_تL04) ف (ّL03_+	ffo
		//مفاعل eg. مباحث
			_مL04ا) ف (L03_+	fe
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_ان) ف (L04اL03_++	fe
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
		//مستفعل eg. مستخدم
			_مست) ف (L04L03_+	f
			_مستL04) ف (L03_	fe
		//متفاعل eg. متفاوت
			_متL04ا) ف (L03_	fe
			_متL04ا) ف (ی_	f
		//متفعل eg. متخصص
			_مت) ف (L04L03_++	fa
			_متL04) ف (L03_+	ffe
		//متفعّل eg. متخصّص
			_مت) ف (L04ّL03_++	fa
			_متL04) ف (ّL03_	ffe
		//مفتعل eg. معتدل
			_م) ف (تL04L03_+	f
			_مL04ت) ف (L03_	fe
		//منفعل eg. منفجر
			_من) ف (L03L03_++	fa
			_من) ف (یL03_+	fa
			_منL04) ف (L03_+	fe
		//منفعله eg. منفجره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)


.group ق
	// special codes for ق
		
	// General Codes for Consonants
	ق (L01	q1
	ق (L02	q1
	L02) ق	q1
	_ا) ق	q1
	ق (ّL08	q1q1
	ق (ّ_	q1q1
	ق (ّL03	q1q1a
	ق (L03	q1a
	L09) ق (ق+++	q1a
	// ق as first letter in bondary of the words
		_) ق (L03	q1a
	// ق in end of the words
		ق (_	q1
	// ق before و and a vowel
		_) ق (وا	q1a
		_) ق (وL02	q1a
		_) ق (ویL03	q1a
		_) ق (ویL01	q1
		_) ق (ویL02	q1
		_) ق (وی_	q1
		L09) ق (وL02	q1
	// Others 
		ق (ه_+++	q1
		ق (ۀ_	q1
		ق (ـL01	q1
		ق (ـL02	q1
		ق (ـL03	q1a
		ق (ــL01	q1
		ق (ــL02	q1
		ق (ــL03	q1a
		ق (ـــL01	q1
		ق (ـــL02	q1
		ق (ـــL03	q1a
		ق (ــ	q1a
	// Consonants Analyzer
	// Right to left characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 3 Consonants
			_آ) ق (L03_	q1a
			_آ) ق (د_+	q1
			_آ) ق (ر_+	q1
			_او) ق (L03_+	q1
			_ای) ق (L03_+	q1
			_L04) ق (L03_	q1
		//Analyzing  2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants
			_L03) ق (L05L06_	q1a
			_L03) ق (L06L03_	q1
			_آ) ق (L03L01	q1
			_آ) ق (L03L02	q1
			_L03) ق (L03L01	q1
			_L03) ق (L06L03	q1a
			_L03) ق (رL03+	q1a
			_L03) ق (L05L03	q1a
		// Analyzing 3th  Consonant of 6 Consonants
			_L09L01) ق (L03L09L09	q1
			_L03L03) ق (L03L09L09	q1
			_L01L03) ق (L03L09L09	q1a
		// Analyzing 4th  Consonant of 8 Consonants
			_L09L09L09) ق (L03L09L09L09	q1a
	// Left to right characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L01) ق (L03_	q1a
			L09L01) ق (L07_+N	q1
			L01L03) ق (L03_	q1a
			L01L03) ق (L07_+N	q1
			L03L03) ق (L03_	q1a
		// Analyzing 3th Consonant of 5 Consonants (left to right)
			L09ق) ق (L03L09_+	q1
			_L04L03) ق (L06L09_+	q1
			_آL03) ق (L05L06_+	q1a
			_آL03) ق (L03L09_+	q1
			L09L03) ق (L03L09_	q1a
			L09L01) ق (L03L09_	q1
		// Analyzing 4th Consonant of 7 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09) ق (L03L09L09_	q1
			_L01L09L03) ق (L03L09L09_	q1
			_L03L09L03) ق (L03L09L09_	q1a
		// Analyzing 5th Consonant of 9 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09L09) ق (L03L09L09L09_	q1a

	// Prefixes ق
		_) قابل (L04L09L09P4@	q1'Abele
		_) قابل (آL09L09P4@	q1'Abele
		_) قرمز (L04L09L09P4@	q1eRmez
		_) قرمز (آL09L09P4@	q1eRmez

	// suffixes ق
		
	// arabic form of words  (Babs) ق
		//فواعل eg. جوامع
			_L04وا) ق (L03_	q1e
			_خوا) ق (L03_+	q1a
		//فاعل eg. کاتب
			_L04ا) ق (L03_+	q1e
		//مفعول eg. مکتوب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعول eg. خروج
			_) ق (L04وL03_	q1o
		//فعال eg. شراب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعل eg. مکتب
			_م) ق (L04L03_+	q1
			_مL04) ق (L03_+	q1a
		//افعال eg. اخلاق (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعّل eg. مقدّس
			_م) ق (L04ّL03_+	q1a
			_مL04) ق (ّL03_+	q1q1a
		//تفعیل eg. تقدیم (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیل eg. صغیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیله eg. صغیره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر
			_اL03) ق (L03_+	q1a
		//تفاعیل eg. تدابیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//تفاعل eg. تفاوت
			_تL04ا) ق (L03_	q1o
		//تفعل eg. تفکر
			_ت) ق (L03L03_+	q1a
			_تL04) ق (L03_++	q1q1o
		//تفعّل eg. تفکّر
			_ت) ق (L03ّL03_+	q1a
			_تL04) ق (ّL03_+	q1q1o
		//مفاعل eg. مباحث
			_مL04ا) ق (L03_	q1e
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_ان) ق (L04اL03_++	q1e
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
		//مستفعل eg. مستخدم
			_مست) ق (L04L03_+	q1
			_مستL04) ق (L03_	q1e
		//متفاعل eg. متفاوت
			_متL04ا) ق (L03_	q1e
			_متL04ا) ق (ی_	q1
		//متفعل eg. متخصص
			_مت) ق (L04L03_++	q1a
			_متL04) ق (L03_	q:q1e
		//متفعّل eg. متخصّص
			_مت) ق (L04ّL03_++	q1a
			_متL04) ق (ّL03_	q:q1e
		//مفتعل eg. معتدل
			_م) ق (تL04L03_+	q1
			_مL04ت) ق (L03_	q1e
		//منفعل eg. منفجر
			_من) ق (L03L03_++	q1a
			_من) ق (یL03_+	q1a
			_منL04) ق (L03_	q1e
		//منفعله eg. منفجره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)


.group ک
	// special codes for ک
		
	// General Codes for Consonants
	ک (L01	k
	ک (L02	k
	L02) ک	k
	_ا) ک	k
	ک (ّL08	kk
	ک (ّ_	kk
	ک (ّL03	kka
	ک (L03	ka
	L09) ک (ک+++	ka
	// ک as first letter in bondary of the words
		_) ک (L03	ka
	// ک in end of the words
		ک (_	k
	// ک before و and a vowel
		_) ک (وا	ka
		_) ک (وL02	ka
		_) ک (ویL03	ka
		_) ک (ویL01	k
		_) ک (ویL02	k
		_) ک (وی_	k
		L09) ک (وL02	k
	// Others 
		ک (ه_+++	k
		ک (ۀ_	k
		ک (ـL01	k
		ک (ـL02	k
		ک (ـL03	ka
		ک (ــL01	k
		ک (ــL02	k
		ک (ــL03	ka
		ک (ـــL01	k
		ک (ـــL02	k
		ک (ـــL03	ka
		ک (ــ	ka
	// Consonants Analyzer
	// Right to left characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 3 Consonants
			_آ) ک (L03_	ka
			_آ) ک (د_+	k
			_آ) ک (ر_+	k
			_او) ک (L03_+	k
			_ای) ک (L03_+	k
			_L04) ک (L03_	k
		//Analyzing  2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants
			_L03) ک (L05L06_	ka
			_L03) ک (L06L03_	k
			_آ) ک (L03L01	k
			_آ) ک (L03L02	k
			_L03) ک (L03L01	k
			_L03) ک (L06L03	ka
			_L03) ک (رL03+	ka
			_L03) ک (L05L03	ka
		// Analyzing 3th  Consonant of 6 Consonants
			_L09L01) ک (L03L09L09	k
			_L03L03) ک (L03L09L09	k
			_L01L03) ک (L03L09L09	ka
		// Analyzing 4th  Consonant of 8 Consonants
			_L09L09L09) ک (L03L09L09L09	ka
	// Left to right characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L01) ک (L03_	ka
			L09L01) ک (L07_+N	k
			L01L03) ک (L03_	ka
			L01L03) ک (L07_+N	k
			L03L03) ک (L03_	ka
		// Analyzing 3th Consonant of 5 Consonants (left to right)
			L09ک) ک (L03L09_+	k
			L09L05) ک (L05L06_	ka
			L09L05) ک (L03L09_	k
			_L04L06) ک (L06L09_+	k
			_آL06) ک (L03L09_+	k
			L09L06) ک (L03L09_	ka
			L09L01) ک (L03L09_	k
		// Analyzing 4th Consonant of 7 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09) ک (L03L09L09_	k
			_L01L09L03) ک (L03L09L09_	k
			_L03L09L03) ک (L03L09L09_	ka
		// Analyzing 5th Consonant of 9 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09L09) ک (L03L09L09L09_	ka

	// Prefixes ک
		_) کم (L04L09L09$noprefixP2@	kam
		_) کم (آL09L09$noprefixP2@	kam
		_) کند (L04L09L09P3@	kond
		_) کند (آL09L09P3@	kond
		_) کیلو (L04L09L09P4@	kilu
		_) کیلو (آL09L09P4@	kilu
		_) کوچک (L04L09L09P4@	kutSak
		_) کوچک (آL09L09P4@	kutSak

	// suffixes ک
		L09L09L03) ک (_Sm1	ak
		//L09L03) کی (_NSm2	aki
		L09L09) کن (_Sm2	kon
		L09L09) کردن (_Sm4	kaRdan
		L09L09) کش (_Sm2	keS
		L09L09) کده (_Sm3	kade
		L09L09) کار (_Sm3	kAR
		L09L09) کاو (_Sm3	kAv
		L09L09) کنان (_Sm4	konAn
		L09L09) کننده (_Sm5	konande:
		L09L09) کنندۀ (_Sm5	konandeje
		L09L09) کنندگان (_Sm7	konandegAn
		L09L09) کوچک (_Sm4	kutSak
		L09L09) کلام (_Sm4	kalAm
		L09L09) کرد (_Sm3	kaRd
